Washington statutes.
RCW 18.27.062

Inspection by department—Subcontractor list—Certificate of registration.

A contractor must maintain and have available for inspection by the department a list of all direct subcontractors and a copy of their certificate of registration.

[ 2009 c 432 s 1.]